Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1119
Reexamination; requirements.

Any person who applies for a license to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting and who has failed on two occasions to pass any part of the practical examination shall be required to complete a course in clinical dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting approved by the board before the department may consider the results of a third examination as a valid qualification for a license to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 452;

Laws 2017, LB18, § 13.